Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 19 Freedom of Information Act of 1967
Circuit court properly denied an attorney's request for information under the employee-evaluation/job-performance exemption in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, because the records of a decision to suspend or terminate a police officer following an investigation into a citizen's complaint by one of the attorney's clients were job-performance records that were not subject to release where the officer was not on duty during the encounters, the client was not arrested, and there was no decision to suspend or terminate the officer.Hyman v. Sadler, 2018 Ark. App. 82, 539 S.W.3d 642 (2018).

School district properly withheld records pertaining to investigations involving two altercations that occurred between a student and teachers where the records fit within the definition of employee-evaluation and job-performance records and the examples provided in attorney general opinions, and there was no evidence that the records were not created by the employer concerning the teachers'performance in regard to the specific incidents.Davis v. Van Buren Sch. Dist., 2019 Ark. App. 157, 572 S.W.3d 466 (2019).

Records pertaining to investigations involving two altercations that occurred between a student and teachers did not fit within the exception in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, as there was no final administrative resolution of any suspension or termination proceeding at which the records formed a basis to suspend or terminate the teachers, it was undisputed that neither teacher was suspended or terminated as a result of the records, and one teacher's resignation occurred before any administrative hearing, resolution, or appeal.Davis v. Van Buren Sch. Dist., 2019 Ark. App. 157, 572 S.W.3d 466 (2019).

Where the high level of publicity and media attention threatened to interfere with defendant's right to a fair trial, the closing of the investigation files of the state police and the files of all investigative agencies, including a legislative audit, by the court, was warranted to ensure the defendant's right to a fair trial. Arkansas Gazette Co. v. Goodwin, 304 Ark. 204, 801 S.W.2d 284 (Ark. 1990).

Circuit court properly found that a prison transport manifest did not fall within the scope of the “undisclosed investigation” exception to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 because the manifest was simply a record kept in the regular course of business and was not investigatory in nature such that the exemption would apply.Holladay v. Glass, 2017 Ark. App. 595, 534 S.W.3d 173 (2017).

Hospital statements taken from witnesses as part of a quality assurance or peer review proceeding were excluded from disclosure and were absolutely privileged communications pursuant to Arkansas statutes. Berry v. Saline Mem. Hosp., 322 Ark. 182, 907 S.W.2d 736 (1995).

Circuit court did not err in ordering a school district to provide electronic copies of paper records at no charge under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967; the school district could scan the paper records and provide them electronically, and the circuit court did not clearly err in finding in this case that the records were “readily available” in an electronic medium.Pulaski Cty. Special Sch. Dist. v. Delaney, 2019 Ark. App. 210, 575 S.W.3d 420 (2019).

School district could not refuse a request under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 to be provided 1,816 pages of records in an electronic format on the ground that the request was too voluminous or burdensome due to the scanning process. In addition, there is no provision in this section that permits a custodian to decide what medium it will provide records to a citizen based on the number of records the school district must redact or the school district's preference to have a hard copy of the documents.Pulaski Cty. Special Sch. Dist. v. Delaney, 2019 Ark. App. 210, 575 S.W.3d 420 (2019).

If a law enforcement investigation remains open and ongoing it is one meant to be protected as “undisclosed” under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act. Martin v. Musteen, 303 Ark. 656, 799 S.W.2d 540 (1990).

The trial court will have to decide, as a matter of fact in each case, whether investigations are ongoing or not for purposes of applying the exemption provided in subdivision (b)(6). Martin v. Musteen, 303 Ark. 656, 799 S.W.2d 540 (1990).

In ordering the Arkansas State Police to release case file records to a murder victim's family pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, the circuit court did not clearly err when it found that the investigation into the victim's murder in 1963 was not open and ongoing, as no charges had been brought or appeared to be imminent. The victim's family and the public were entitled to know how law enforcement officials performed their duties.Dep't of Ark. State Police v. Keech Law Firm, P.A., 2017 Ark. 143, 516 S.W.3d 265 (2017).

Exemption from disclosure under subdivision (b)(6) of this section requires an investigation to be open and ongoing to qualify for nondisclosure. Whether an investigation is open and ongoing is by necessity a question of fact to be determined on a case-by-case basis.Dep't of Ark. State Police v. Keech Law Firm, P.A., 2017 Ark. 143, 516 S.W.3d 265 (2017).

Intent of Freedom of Information Act includes a corporation doing business in this state as being a party entitled to information. Hence, representative of corporation is entitled to receive any information that any other person would be entitled to receive pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act. Ark. Hwy. & Transp. Dep't v. Hope Brick Works, Inc., 294 Ark. 490, 744 S.W.2d 711 (1988).

The public, for whose benefit this chapter was enacted, includes both those who support and those who oppose the actions or inactions of public officials, employees or agencies, as well as those who wish to merely learn of and evaluate the actions of public officials. City of Fayetteville v. Edmark, 304 Ark. 179, 801 S.W.2d 275 (1990).

The Attorney General, acting in his official capacity and using the resources of his office, possesses standing to appeal the denial of his request pursuant to the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act. Bryant v. Weiss, 335 Ark. 534, 983 S.W.2d 902 (1998).

Pursuant to this section, while the contractor possessed the records requested, it was not an entity covered by the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA), §25-19-101 et seq., which would render it subject to suit under the FOIA; therefore, the association's suit was reversed and dismissed.Nabholz Constr. Corp. v. Contrs. for Pub. Prot. Ass'n, 371 Ark. 411, 266 S.W.3d 689 (2007).

Subdivision (b)(10) requires that the public's right to knowledge of records be weighed against an individual's right to privacy, so that when the public's interest is substantial, it will usually outweigh any individual privacy interests, and disclosure will be favored. Young v. Rice, 308 Ark. 593, 826 S.W.2d 252 (1992).

Where the release of records could subject candidates for police lieutenant to embarrassment, and perhaps threaten their future employment, release would result in a clearly unwarranted invasion of the candidates' personal privacy; although the public's interest in knowing that its safety is protected by the best-qualified police lieutenant is also substantial, it was served by the release of the report forms, even though the candidates' identities remained unknown. Young v. Rice, 308 Ark. 593, 826 S.W.2d 252 (1992).

In connection with the claim that the home address of a ratepayer should not be disclosed, the department made a policy argument that since a public employee's personal contact information was exempted from disclosure, so should that of a private customer, but it was the job of the General Assembly to establish exemptions under the Freedom of Information Act, and arguments for additional exemptions had to be addressed to the General Assembly, not the court.Hopkins v. City of Brinkley, 2014 Ark. 139, 432 S.W.3d 609 (2014).

The books and records of a city collector's office are at all times available to the public. Pointer v. State, 248 Ark. 710, 454 S.W.2d 91 (1970), cert. denied, Pointer v. Arkansas, 400 U.S. 959, 91 S. Ct. 359 (1970).

Records of intercollegiate conference on the amount of money that its member institutions disbursed to its student athletes records were not “educational” records under the Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, and were not closed to the public because they were not individual education or academic records. Arkansas Gazette Co. v. Southern State College, 273 Ark. 248, 620 S.W.2d 258 (1981), dismissed, 455 U.S. 931, 102 S. Ct. 1416 (1982).

Information stored on computer tapes is a public record, and the public is entitled to have it in the form in which it is kept. Blaylock v. Staley, 293 Ark. 26, 732 S.W.2d 152 (1987).

Committee violated the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act when it used unsigned written ballots which were disposed of in a manner making their review impossible. Depoyster v. Cole, 298 Ark. 203, 766 S.W.2d 606 (1989), overruled in part, Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 366 Ark. 277, 234 S.W.3d 875 (2006).

While items obtained by police in the course of a criminal investigation involve personal matters, the governmental interest in disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act may outweigh the privacy interest in the nondisclosure of personal matters. McCambridge v. City of Little Rock, 298 Ark. 219, 766 S.W.2d 909 (1989).

Legal memoranda prepared by outside counsel for the City for litigation purposes are public records within the meaning of this chapter and are open to inspection, and, the enhanced risk that the City may lose litigation does not constitute an exemption. City of Fayetteville v. Edmark, 304 Ark. 179, 801 S.W.2d 275 (1990).

The jail log, arrest records and shift sheet requested from the police department by a news reporter were not records containing undisclosed law enforcement investigations and were subject to disclosure pursuant to this section. Hengel v. City of Pine Bluff, 307 Ark. 457, 821 S.W.2d 761 (1991).

There is no statute that specifically provides for the exemption of the names of juveniles arrested for felonies but not charged as delinquent juveniles, thus, detention facility logs and booking sheets of juvenile detention facilities are not exempt. Troutt Bros. v. Emison, 311 Ark. 27, 841 S.W.2d 604 (1992).

By requiring audits to be performed by a private auditing firm and not the state auditor, the state, in §15-5-210, has elected to employ a private firm to perform a task normally carried out by state employees or officials; thus, the audit working papers of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee are considered public records subject to this chapter. Swaney v. Tilford, 320 Ark. 652, 898 S.W.2d 462 (1995).

Judgment was properly awarded to appellee in an action against a police chief, in the chief's capacity as the custodian of records for the police department, for violation of the Arkansas FOIA because an officer's use-of-force reports describing an incident with appellee did not fall within the exemption in subdivision (c)(1) of this section for employee evaluation or job performance records.Thomas v. Hall, 2012 Ark. 66, 399 S.W.3d 387 (2012).

Legal opinions rendered in tax cases under Gross Receipts Tax Rule G-75 are subject to disclosure to a company because they are “otherwise kept” public records under §25-19-103(5)(A); however, any and all identifying facts and information have to be fully redacted under subdivision (f)(1)–(3) of this section. Moreover, the legal opinions are not confidential because §26-18-303(a)(1) does not cover Gross Receipts Tax Rule G-75; state law does not require that the opinions be kept by or filed with the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.Ryan & Co. v. Weiss, 371 Ark. 43, 263 S.W.3d 489 (2007).

As the police department operated 24 hours a day, seven days a week, in the absence of some showing to the contrary those were its regular business hours. Hengel v. City of Pine Bluff, 307 Ark. 457, 821 S.W.2d 761 (1991).

Cited: Baxter County Newspapers, Inc. v. Medical Staff of Baxter Gen. Hosp., 273 Ark. 511, 622 S.W.2d 495 (1981); Morton v. City of Little Rock, 728 F. Supp. 543 (E.D. Ark. 1989); Ark. Dep't of Health v. Westark Christian Action Council, 322 Ark. 440, 910 S.W.2d 199 (1995); Hamilton v. Simpson, 67 Ark. App. 173, 993 S.W.2d 501 (1999); Jegley v. Picado, 349 Ark. 600, 80 S.W.3d 332 (2002); Watkins v. Dale, 2011 Ark. App. 385 (2011).

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1001, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Acts 2020, No. 2, §43, provided: “TEMPORARY LANGUAGE AND SUSPENSION OF CURRENT LAW.

“(a)Section 42 of this act is cumulative of existing laws and suspends, but does not repeal, any law in conflict with Section 74 of this act.

“(b)(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, Section 42 of this act is temporary and expires on the date that the Governor determines that the emergency under Arkansas Code §§12-75-101 et seq, and §20-7-110 in response to an outbreak of coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) has ended.

“(2)If the Governor has not determined by December 31, 2020, that the emergency under Arkansas Code §§12-75-101 et seq, and §20-7-110 in response to an outbreak of coronavirus disease 2019 (COVID-19) has ended, Section 42 of this act shall expire on December 31, 2020.

“(c)On the expiration of Section 42, the provisions of law suspended by Section 42 of this act are in full force and effect.

“(d)The expiration of Section 42 of this act does not affect rights acquired under this act or affect suits then pending”.

Publisher's Notes. For text of section effective when emergency ends or December 31, 2020, see the following version.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “July 1, 2011” for “July 1, 2009” in (c)(6)(B) and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendment substituted “July 1, 2013” for “July 1, 2011” in (c)(6)(B).

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (c)(6)(A) as (c)(6), and deleted (c)(6)(B).

The 2015 amendment inserted “or municipally owned utility system security” in (c)(6).

The 2017 amendment redesignated (c)(1) as (c)(1)(A) and (B); substituted “Except as provided under subdivision (c)(6) of this section, an executive session” for “Executive sessions” in (c)(1)(A); and added (c)(7).

The 2019 amendment added (d).

The 2020 amendment added (e).

Ark. L. Rev.

Recent Developments, Freedom of Information Act — Public Meetings Requirement, 57 Ark. L. Rev. 1015.

Note, Harris v. City of Fort Smith: Arkansas's Sunshine Clouds Over, 59 Ark. L. Rev. 147.

Bobbi J. Boyd, Do It in the Sunshine: A Comparative Analysis of Rulemaking Procedures and Transparency Practices of Lawyer-Licensing Entities, 70 Ark. L. Rev. 609 (2017).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brooks, Adventures in Cyber-Space: Computer Technology and the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 417.

The legislature, in this section, has provided for both the public's right to know and protection of the individual's rights from unwarranted adverse publicity and ensuing damage to his reputation. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

Circuit court's determination that §25-19-104 and this section were unconstitutional was improper because declaratory relief was inappropriate under §16-111-104 as appellees did not yet have a case or controversy ready for decision by the courts. Appellees received a legal opinion on the effects of certain provisions of the state's Freedom of Information Act rather than resolution of an actual controversy.McCutchen v. City of Fort Smith, 2012 Ark. 452, 425 S.W.3d 671 (2012).

After reviewing §§25-19-102,25-19-105, and this section, the court found nothing in the Freedom of Information Act that specifies that the communications media by which the public's business is conducted are limited to publicly owned communications; thus, the court rejected a state employee's claim that the employee was asked to violate the law by communicating with the governor via a private email address and, thus, the employee's subsequent resignation was voluntary without good cause and the employee was not entitled to benefits under §11-10-513(a)(1). Bradford v. Dir., Empl. Sec. Dep't., 83 Ark. App. 332, 128 S.W.3d 20 (2003).

The Freedom of Information Act applies to formal and informal meetings alike, not just to meetings of officially designated committees, and applies to informal but unofficial group meetings for the discussion of governmental business. Mayor of El Dorado v. El Dorado Broadcasting Co., 260 Ark. 821, 544 S.W.2d 206 (1976).

This section does not encompass staff meetings of the Department of Human Services held to develop a bid solicitation. National Park Medical Ctr. v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 322 Ark. 595, 911 S.W.2d 250 (1995).

City administrator's succession of one-on-one conversations with each member of the city's board of directors violated the “open meetings” provision of the Freedom of Information Act, §§25-19-101 —25-19-109; through its conversations the board held a meeting within the intent of the FOIA such that the city's actions resulted in a consensus being reached on a given issue, thus rendering the formal meeting held before the public a mere charade. Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 86 Ark. App. 20, 158 S.W.3d 733 (2004), aff'd, 359 Ark. 355, 197 S.W.3d 461 (2004).

Open-meeting provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 apply to email and other forms of electronic communication between governmental officials just as surely as they apply to in-person or telephonic conversations.City of Fort Smith v. Wade, 2019 Ark. 222, 578 S.W.3d 276 (2019).

Where committee of a state board meets to transact business, such meeting is a public meeting subject to the provisions of this chapter and a newspaper reporter must be permitted to attend, and may seek a declaratory judgment if refused admission. Ark. Gazette Co. v. Pickens, 258 Ark. 69, 522 S.W.2d 350 (1975).

This chapter repealed former open meetings law by implication and thus, since no advance notice of emergency meetings of school board were required unless requested by the news media under this section, approval of $150,000 bond issue by electors of school district was not void for failure to give notice of meetings. Nance v. Williams, 263 Ark. 237, 564 S.W.2d 212 (1978).

The allegation that a special meeting had been called without notice to the press states a cause of action at law for a declaratory judgment. Yandell v. Havana Bd. of Educ., 266 Ark. 434, 585 S.W.2d 927 (1979).

Subsection (b)(2) of this section provides that the news media located in the county where the meeting is held and those located elsewhere that cover regular meetings of the body may request that they be notified of special and emergency meetings; absent such a request, no notice to them is required. Elmore v. Burke, 337 Ark. 235, 987 S.W.2d 730 (1999).

It was a violation of this section for a city council to go into an executive session with the mayor and city attorney to discuss a Public Service Commission proceeding to which the city was a party. Laman v. McCord, 245 Ark. 401, 432 S.W.2d 753 (1968).

This section required that the hearing of testimony concerning reinstatement of a discharged officer, as distinguished from a discussion or consideration by the State Police Commission, be held in public. Ark. State Police Comm'n v. Davidson, 253 Ark. 1090, 490 S.W.2d 788 (1973).

This section makes it mandatory for the commissioners to reassemble in public session for the purpose of voting on the matter which they have discussed or considered in executive session. Ark. State Police Comm'n v. Davidson, 253 Ark. 1090, 490 S.W.2d 788 (1973).

Once an executive session had been called for a proper purpose, the subsequent discussion could of necessity deal with several areas which, taken out of the context of the total discussion, might be construed as improper subject matter for an executive session. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

It is not the bare decision whether or not to discipline an employee that the executive session provision allows to be made in privacy, but rather the discussion or consideration of particular acts or omissions of the employee whose conduct has been called into question so as to avoid adverse publicity and unjustified damage to the reputation of individuals, allegations against whom later prove unwarranted. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

Once a decision has been made in executive session that discipline or other action is needed, all further acts of the board should be public, and the public officials accountable and answerable for their actions. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

A resolution or motion actually considered or arrived at in executive session must be publicly ratified if it is to be legal. Yandell v. Havana Bd. of Educ., 266 Ark. 434, 585 S.W.2d 927 (1979).

A meeting of the credentials committee of the medical staff of a county hospital for the hearing of testimony and a vote on whether the staff privileges of a doctor should be continued was required to be held in public, since the doctor's status was that of an individual who has certain privileges extended to him by a publicly owned, operated and supported county hospital; however, the discussion or consideration of the specific issue by the committee members could be conducted in executive session. Baxter County Newspapers, Inc. v. Medical Staff of Baxter Gen. Hosp., 273 Ark. 511, 622 S.W.2d 495 (1981).

Where city board members held one-on-one meetings discussing the potential purchase of property, the meetings violated subsection (a) of this section because the members had made up there minds before the public meeting and, thus, the meetings constituted board meetings under §25-19-103(4). Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 359 Ark. 355, 197 S.W.3d 461 (2004).

In an action to enjoin purchase of voting machines for noncompliance with this chapter, where plaintiffs testified that the general public was expelled from the meeting of the election commissioners to open and consider bids, but election commissioners and others testified that, when representatives of voting machine companies were asked to step outside, others left voluntarily, it was not error to deny the injunction. Davis v. Jerry, 245 Ark. 500, 432 S.W.2d 831 (1968).

Before invalidation of decision made in violation of this section is sought the board or agency must be given the opportunity to address the issue. Rehab Hospital Services Corp. v. Delta-Hills Health Systems Agency, Inc., 285 Ark. 397, 687 S.W.2d 840 (1985).

In circumstances in which a city administrator, prior to a board study session, prepared a memorandum and draft ordinance and provided the documents to individual board members, no violation of this section of the state FOIA occurred because only information was provided; no solicitation of votes for the proposal took place.McCutchen v. City of Fort Smith, 2012 Ark. 452, 425 S.W.3d 671 (2012).

Circuit court erred in granting a petitioner's motion for summary judgment and finding that a city violated the open-meeting provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 when city directors and the city administrator exchanged emails relating to the police chief's proposed change to civil service commission rules to permit appointment of external candidates for the rank of sergeant and higher. No decision was made through the use of email; the emails contained information, a recommendation, and unsolicited responses with no decision, and the city board of directors discussed the proposed rule change at a public meeting.City of Fort Smith v. Wade, 2019 Ark. 222, 578 S.W.3d 276 (2019).

When notice of a school board meeting was provided, but during the meeting five school board members decided to hold a “Committee of the Whole” meeting to discuss a controversial subject while they were waiting for another school board member to arrive, appellant's claim that a separate notice was required for the committee meeting failed. The required statutory notice of the school board meeting was provided to media outlets, and the media was present before the committee began its discussion.Bradshaw v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2017 Ark. App. 196, 519 S.W.3d 344 (2017).

Appellant failed to show prejudice as she had not requested personal notice of any board meetings, and nothing in this section required notice to the general public.Bradshaw v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2017 Ark. App. 196, 519 S.W.3d 344 (2017).

A private, nonprofit association of colleges and secondary schools which was composed of public servants and accepted public moneys was subject to this chapter. North Cent. Ass'n of Colleges & Sch. v. Troutt Bros., 261 Ark. 378, 548 S.W.2d 825 (1977).

A nonprofit regional health planning corporation which received its primary funding from the federal government was subject to this chapter and violated its open public meeting requirements when it reconsidered the granting of a certificate of need to construct a hospital after conducting a telephone poll of members of the executive committee. Rehab Hospital Services Corp. v. Delta-Hills Health Systems Agency, Inc., 285 Ark. 397, 687 S.W.2d 840 (1985).

Cited: Wright v. South Ark. Regional Health Ctr., Inc., 800 F.2d 199 (8th Cir. 1986).

A.C.R.C. Notes. This section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 1001, § 1. Acts 1987, No. 834, provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Publisher's Notes. For text of section effective until emergency ends or December 31, 2020, see the preceding version.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “July 1, 2011” for “July 1, 2009” in (c)(6)(B) and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendment substituted “July 1, 2013” for “July 1, 2011” in (c)(6)(B).

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (c)(6)(A) as (c)(6), and deleted (c)(6)(B).

The 2015 amendment inserted “or municipally owned utility system security” in (c)(6).

The 2017 amendment redesignated (c)(1) as (c)(1)(A) and (B); substituted “Except as provided under subdivision (c)(6) of this section, an executive session” for “Executive sessions” in (c)(1)(A); and added (c)(7).

The 2019 amendment added (d).

Ark. L. Rev.

Recent Developments, Freedom of Information Act — Public Meetings Requirement, 57 Ark. L. Rev. 1015.

Note, Harris v. City of Fort Smith: Arkansas's Sunshine Clouds Over, 59 Ark. L. Rev. 147.

Bobbi J. Boyd, Do It in the Sunshine: A Comparative Analysis of Rulemaking Procedures and Transparency Practices of Lawyer-Licensing Entities, 70 Ark. L. Rev. 609 (2017).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Brooks, Adventures in Cyber-Space: Computer Technology and the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 417.

The legislature, in this section, has provided for both the public's right to know and protection of the individual's rights from unwarranted adverse publicity and ensuing damage to his reputation. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

Circuit court's determination that §25-19-104 and this section were unconstitutional was improper because declaratory relief was inappropriate under §16-111-104 as appellees did not yet have a case or controversy ready for decision by the courts. Appellees received a legal opinion on the effects of certain provisions of the state's Freedom of Information Act rather than resolution of an actual controversy.McCutchen v. City of Fort Smith, 2012 Ark. 452, 425 S.W.3d 671 (2012).

After reviewing §§25-19-102,25-19-105, and this section, the court found nothing in the Freedom of Information Act that specifies that the communications media by which the public's business is conducted are limited to publicly owned communications; thus, the court rejected a state employee's claim that the employee was asked to violate the law by communicating with the governor via a private email address and, thus, the employee's subsequent resignation was voluntary without good cause and the employee was not entitled to benefits under §11-10-513(a)(1). Bradford v. Dir., Empl. Sec. Dep't., 83 Ark. App. 332, 128 S.W.3d 20 (2003).

The Freedom of Information Act applies to formal and informal meetings alike, not just to meetings of officially designated committees, and applies to informal but unofficial group meetings for the discussion of governmental business. Mayor of El Dorado v. El Dorado Broadcasting Co., 260 Ark. 821, 544 S.W.2d 206 (1976).

This section does not encompass staff meetings of the Department of Human Services held to develop a bid solicitation. National Park Medical Ctr. v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 322 Ark. 595, 911 S.W.2d 250 (1995).

City administrator's succession of one-on-one conversations with each member of the city's board of directors violated the “open meetings” provision of the Freedom of Information Act, §§25-19-101 —25-19-109; through its conversations the board held a meeting within the intent of the FOIA such that the city's actions resulted in a consensus being reached on a given issue, thus rendering the formal meeting held before the public a mere charade. Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 86 Ark. App. 20, 158 S.W.3d 733 (2004), aff'd, 359 Ark. 355, 197 S.W.3d 461 (2004).

Open-meeting provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 apply to email and other forms of electronic communication between governmental officials just as surely as they apply to in-person or telephonic conversations.City of Fort Smith v. Wade, 2019 Ark. 222, 578 S.W.3d 276 (2019).

Where committee of a state board meets to transact business, such meeting is a public meeting subject to the provisions of this chapter and a newspaper reporter must be permitted to attend, and may seek a declaratory judgment if refused admission. Ark. Gazette Co. v. Pickens, 258 Ark. 69, 522 S.W.2d 350 (1975).

This chapter repealed former open meetings law by implication and thus, since no advance notice of emergency meetings of school board were required unless requested by the news media under this section, approval of $150,000 bond issue by electors of school district was not void for failure to give notice of meetings. Nance v. Williams, 263 Ark. 237, 564 S.W.2d 212 (1978).

The allegation that a special meeting had been called without notice to the press states a cause of action at law for a declaratory judgment. Yandell v. Havana Bd. of Educ., 266 Ark. 434, 585 S.W.2d 927 (1979).

Subsection (b)(2) of this section provides that the news media located in the county where the meeting is held and those located elsewhere that cover regular meetings of the body may request that they be notified of special and emergency meetings; absent such a request, no notice to them is required. Elmore v. Burke, 337 Ark. 235, 987 S.W.2d 730 (1999).

It was a violation of this section for a city council to go into an executive session with the mayor and city attorney to discuss a Public Service Commission proceeding to which the city was a party. Laman v. McCord, 245 Ark. 401, 432 S.W.2d 753 (1968).

This section required that the hearing of testimony concerning reinstatement of a discharged officer, as distinguished from a discussion or consideration by the State Police Commission, be held in public. Ark. State Police Comm'n v. Davidson, 253 Ark. 1090, 490 S.W.2d 788 (1973).

This section makes it mandatory for the commissioners to reassemble in public session for the purpose of voting on the matter which they have discussed or considered in executive session. Ark. State Police Comm'n v. Davidson, 253 Ark. 1090, 490 S.W.2d 788 (1973).

Once an executive session had been called for a proper purpose, the subsequent discussion could of necessity deal with several areas which, taken out of the context of the total discussion, might be construed as improper subject matter for an executive session. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

It is not the bare decision whether or not to discipline an employee that the executive session provision allows to be made in privacy, but rather the discussion or consideration of particular acts or omissions of the employee whose conduct has been called into question so as to avoid adverse publicity and unjustified damage to the reputation of individuals, allegations against whom later prove unwarranted. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

Once a decision has been made in executive session that discipline or other action is needed, all further acts of the board should be public, and the public officials accountable and answerable for their actions. Commercial Printing Co. v. Rush, 261 Ark. 468, 549 S.W.2d 790 (1977).

A resolution or motion actually considered or arrived at in executive session must be publicly ratified if it is to be legal. Yandell v. Havana Bd. of Educ., 266 Ark. 434, 585 S.W.2d 927 (1979).

A meeting of the credentials committee of the medical staff of a county hospital for the hearing of testimony and a vote on whether the staff privileges of a doctor should be continued was required to be held in public, since the doctor's status was that of an individual who has certain privileges extended to him by a publicly owned, operated and supported county hospital; however, the discussion or consideration of the specific issue by the committee members could be conducted in executive session. Baxter County Newspapers, Inc. v. Medical Staff of Baxter Gen. Hosp., 273 Ark. 511, 622 S.W.2d 495 (1981).

Where city board members held one-on-one meetings discussing the potential purchase of property, the meetings violated subsection (a) of this section because the members had made up there minds before the public meeting and, thus, the meetings constituted board meetings under §25-19-103(4). Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 359 Ark. 355, 197 S.W.3d 461 (2004).

In an action to enjoin purchase of voting machines for noncompliance with this chapter, where plaintiffs testified that the general public was expelled from the meeting of the election commissioners to open and consider bids, but election commissioners and others testified that, when representatives of voting machine companies were asked to step outside, others left voluntarily, it was not error to deny the injunction. Davis v. Jerry, 245 Ark. 500, 432 S.W.2d 831 (1968).

Before invalidation of decision made in violation of this section is sought the board or agency must be given the opportunity to address the issue. Rehab Hospital Services Corp. v. Delta-Hills Health Systems Agency, Inc., 285 Ark. 397, 687 S.W.2d 840 (1985).

In circumstances in which a city administrator, prior to a board study session, prepared a memorandum and draft ordinance and provided the documents to individual board members, no violation of this section of the state FOIA occurred because only information was provided; no solicitation of votes for the proposal took place.McCutchen v. City of Fort Smith, 2012 Ark. 452, 425 S.W.3d 671 (2012).

Circuit court erred in granting a petitioner's motion for summary judgment and finding that a city violated the open-meeting provisions of the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 when city directors and the city administrator exchanged emails relating to the police chief's proposed change to civil service commission rules to permit appointment of external candidates for the rank of sergeant and higher. No decision was made through the use of email; the emails contained information, a recommendation, and unsolicited responses with no decision, and the city board of directors discussed the proposed rule change at a public meeting.City of Fort Smith v. Wade, 2019 Ark. 222, 578 S.W.3d 276 (2019).

When notice of a school board meeting was provided, but during the meeting five school board members decided to hold a “Committee of the Whole” meeting to discuss a controversial subject while they were waiting for another school board member to arrive, appellant's claim that a separate notice was required for the committee meeting failed. The required statutory notice of the school board meeting was provided to media outlets, and the media was present before the committee began its discussion.Bradshaw v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2017 Ark. App. 196, 519 S.W.3d 344 (2017).

Appellant failed to show prejudice as she had not requested personal notice of any board meetings, and nothing in this section required notice to the general public.Bradshaw v. Fort Smith Sch. Dist., 2017 Ark. App. 196, 519 S.W.3d 344 (2017).

A private, nonprofit association of colleges and secondary schools which was composed of public servants and accepted public moneys was subject to this chapter. North Cent. Ass'n of Colleges & Sch. v. Troutt Bros., 261 Ark. 378, 548 S.W.2d 825 (1977).

A nonprofit regional health planning corporation which received its primary funding from the federal government was subject to this chapter and violated its open public meeting requirements when it reconsidered the granting of a certificate of need to construct a hospital after conducting a telephone poll of members of the executive committee. Rehab Hospital Services Corp. v. Delta-Hills Health Systems Agency, Inc., 285 Ark. 397, 687 S.W.2d 840 (1985).

Cited: Wright v. South Ark. Regional Health Ctr., Inc., 800 F.2d 199 (8th Cir. 1986).

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “the State of Arkansas or a department, agency, or institution” for “an agency” in (a); subdivided (d) and deleted “or that other circumstances make an award of these expenses unjust. However, no expense shall be assessed against the State of Arkansas or any of its agencies or departments” following “substantially justified” in (d)(1); and added (e).

ALR.

Exhaustion of administrative remedies as prerequisite to judicial action to compel disclosure under state freedom of information acts. 114 A.L.R.5th 283.

Construction and application of state freedom of information act provisions concerning award of attorney's fees and other litigation costs. 118 A.L.R.5th 1.

Where the circumstances do not suggest either arbitrary or bad faith conduct, an award of fees and costs is not warranted. Depoyster v. Cole, 298 Ark. 203, 766 S.W.2d 606 (1989), overruled in part, Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 366 Ark. 277, 234 S.W.3d 875 (2006).

The trial court need not make a fee award in every Freedom of Information Act case; the purpose of the fee-shifting provision is to assess fees and costs where public officials have acted arbitrarily or in bad faith in withholding records. Burke v. Strange, 335 Ark. 328, 983 S.W.2d 389 (1998).

The appellant was properly denied attorneys' fees where (1) the record indicated that he was never denied access to the documents requested, and that the appellee voluntarily provided the requested documents when he became aware of their location and status, and (2) the appellant filed his action for attorneys' fees only one business day after filing his FOIA request, in violation of §25-19-105(e). Hamilton v. Simpson, 67 Ark. App. 173, 993 S.W.2d 501 (1999).
